










 





EEA and Norway Grants Fund for Youth Employment, 2017 Scholarship Positions 2017 2018




























































































Navigation






Scholarship Positions 2017 2018
2017 Online College University Scholarships PhD Masters Graduate Financial Aid Positions Free


Best Grants, Scholarships & Financial Aid for College & University Students

 













 
Home > Cyprus Scholarships > EEA and Norway Grants Fund for Youth Employment, 2017

EEA and Norway Grants Fund for Youth Employment, 2017 


 


Sponsored Links















With this call, The EEA Grants and Norway Grants Fund for young, ambitious applicants to pursue research programme.
The fund aims to support measures that promote youth employment across Europe.
The EEA Grants and Norway Grants are the financial contributions of Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein towards the reduction of economic and social disparities in the European Economic Area (EEA) and to strengthen bilateral relations with 16 EU and EEA Member States in Northern, Central and Southern Europe.
Course Level: These grants are available to pursue research.
Study Subject: These grants are awarded to projects and activities based on the common values of:

Respect for human dignity;
Freedom;
Democracy;
Equality;
Rule of law; and
Respect for human rights, including the rights of people belonging to minorities

Scholarship Award: These grants will cover the followings:

The available budget under this call is EUR 60.61 million.
The amount of grant assistance applied for within a project shall not be less than EUR 1 million.
There is no maximum grant amount per project. The Financial Mechanism Committee reserves the right not to award all the available funds, to re-publish this call or to reallocate the funds to subsequent calls or other activities.

Numbers of Scholarships: Not known
Scholarship can be taken in Iceland, Liechtenstein and Norway
Eligibility: Applicants must meet the following area for these grants:

The long-term unemployed;
Discouraged people who have stopped looking for work,
Inactive women caring for children or incapacitated adults,
Ethnic minorities including Roma,
Asylum-seekers,
The low-skilled,
People with mental health issues and
The disabled

Nationality: Applicants of Ireland, Italy, Spain, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Czech Republic, Slovakia, Hungary, Slovenia, Croatia, Romania, Bulgaria, Greece, Cyprus, Malta and Portugal can apply for these grants.
College Admission Requirement
Entrance Requirement: Applicants must have previous year degree.
English Language Requirement: Applicants need to demonstrate that they have a good level of written and spoken English
International Scholarship
How to Apply: The concept note shall be submitted electronically via the fund operator’s system (EGREG).

Applicants are invited to submit a project concept note briefly describing the project idea, project activities and outputs, the members of the project consortium and a tentative budget.

Online application
Application Deadline: The application deadline is August 1, 2017.
Scholarship Link



By Scholarship Positions on June 27, 2017 in Cyprus Scholarships, Czech Republic Scholarships, Estonia Scholarship, Hungry Scholarship, Iceland Scholarships, Ireland Scholarships, Italy PhD Scholarships, Lithuania Scholarship, Malta, Norway Scholarships, Research Scholarships, Slovenia Scholarships, Spain Scholarships 

 2017, Bulgaria, Croatia, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Estonia, EU, Grant, Greece, Hungary, Ireland, Italy, Latvia, Lithuania, Malta, Norway, Poland, Portugal, research, Romania, Slovakia, Slovenia, Spain 




Sponsored Links








Need Scholarship Help? Comment and Discuss.












 PhD Scholarships at Centre for the Study of Manuscript Cultures in Germany, 2017
SERB High Risk-High Research Awards for Indian Students, 2017 




 



 



Looking for Scholarships?
Get international funding options for Undergraduate, Masters, PhD and Post-Doc 
Courses.

































 


 

Popular Latest Tags 




 Zenith International Undergraduate Scholarships at Robert Gordon University in UK, 2017
July 25, 2017



 PhD Scholarship for International Students at Polish Academy of Sciences, 2017
July 24, 2017



 KLK Graduate Scholarship for Malaysian Applicants, 2017
July 24, 2017



 NEC C&C Foundation-Grants for Non-Japanese Researchers at Saitama University in Japan, 2018
July 24, 2017



 Full NZ-China NCD PhD Scholarships at University of Auckland in New Zealand, 2018
July 24, 2017





 Government of Hong Kong Scholarships for English Teachers, 2017-2018
July 28, 2017



 ACIS Cassamarca Scholarships for Postgraduate Research in Italy, 2018
July 28, 2017



 Faculty of Medicin Doctoral Grant at University of Antwerp in Belgium, 2017
July 28, 2017



 Foundation Edu Scholarship at University of Ghana, 2017
July 28, 2017



 Fully Funded UNAOC Young Peacebuilders in MENA  Programme in Jordan, 2017
July 28, 2017




2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016
2017
2018
Australia
Business
Canada
College
Denmark
Doctoral
Engineering
EU
Featured
Fellowship
Fellowships
Germany
Graduate
India
International
Law
Management
Master
Masters
New Zealand
PhD
Postdoctoral
Postgraduate
research
Scholarship
Scholarships
Science
Sciences
students
Studentship
Sweden
Technology
UK
Undergraduate
University
Updated Scholarships
USA 


  Featured Scholarships50 International Scholarships for Short Courses at ESE in Madrid Campus, 2017Merit Scholarships for International Undergraduate Students at University of Vermont in USA, 2018International Graduate Student Scholarships at Universiti Putra Malaysia, 2017-2018NUS Data Science Scholarships for International Students in Singapore, 2017University of Miami Scholarships for International Students in USA, 2017 





 Free Online Courses (MOOC)Eindhoven University of Technology Free Online Course on Process Mining in HealthcareFree Online Course on Data Explosion and its Impact on Fraud DetectionUniversity of Edinburgh Free Online Course on Social WellbeingFree Online Course on Quality Improvement in HealthcareHarvard 
 Undergraduate Degree ScholarshipsParamedicine/Nursing Scholarships at Australian Catholic University, 2017Science and Technology Undergraduate Scholarships in Filipino Students, 2018Cunningham Undergraduate Bursaries at City University London in UK, 2017/2018Full and Half Tuition Excellence Scholarships at Pinehurst School in New Zealand, 2017 
Applying for Scholarships in 2017-2018?
Apply for top 2017-18 scholarships and financial aid positions before application deadlines.
2017-2018 Scholarships
Featured Scholarships

 

 
 

100% MBA Scholarships
Study Abroad
Read More








Search Free Scholarships


 



Our Mission Change lives of international students by helping them achieving successful scholarships, financial aid and free education. 
About Us Scholarship-Positions.com was started in 2007 by Oxford University graduates for helping international students in finding suitable scholarships to study abroad.
We have helped thousands of students in securing scholarships and financial aid in the world's top universities.
Our objective is to help international students in finding matching scholarships - just in time

 

 InternshipsCategoriesCategories
Select Category
Afghanistan Scholarships
Africa Scholarships
   Albania Scholarships
   Algeria Scholarships
   Angola Scholarships
   Benin Scholarships
   Botswana Scholarships
   Burkina Faso Scholarships
   Burundi Scholarships
   Cameroon Scholarships
   Cape Verde Scholarships
   Central African Republic
   Chad Scholarships
   Comoros Scholarships
   Congo Republic
   Djibouti Scholarships
   Egypt Scholarships
   Equatorial Guinea
   Eritrea Scholarships
   Ethiopia Scholarships
   Gabon Scholarships
   Gambia Scholarships
   Ghana Scholarships
   Guinea Scholarships
   Guinea-Bissau Scholarships
   Ivory Coast Scholarships
   Kenya Scholarships
   Lesotho Scholarships
   Liberia Scholarships
   Libya Scholarships
   Madagascar Scholarships
   Malawi Scholarships
   Mali Scholarships
   Mauritania Scholarships
   Mauritius Scholarships
   Morocco Scholarships
   Mozambique Scholarships
   Namibia Scholarships
   Niger Scholarships
   Rwanda Scholarships
   Sao Tome and Principe
   Scholarships For Nigerians
   Senegal Scholarships
   Seychelles Scholarships
   Sierra Leone Scholarships
   Somalia Scholarships
   South Africa Scholarships
   Sudan Scholarships
   Swaziland Scholarships
   Tanzania Scholarships
   Togo Scholarships
   Tunisia Scholarships
   Uganda Scholarships
   Zambia Scholarships
   Zimbabwe Scholarships
Armenian Scholarships
Australia Scholarships
Austria Scholarships
Awards and Grants
Azerbaijan Scholarships
Bangladesh Scholarships
Barbados Scholarships
Belgium Scholarships
Bhutan Scholarships
Brazil Scholarships
Cambodia Scholarships
Canada Scholarships
China Scholarships
College Scholarships
Competitions
Computer Science PhD Programmes
Cuba Scholarships
Cyprus Scholarships
Czech Republic Scholarships
Denmark Scholarships
Distance Learning Scholarships
Ecology Scholarships
Essay Competitions
Estonia Scholarship
Featured Scholarships
Filipino Scholarships
Finland Scholarships
France Scholarships
Free Courses
Georgia Scholarships
Germany PhDs
Germany PostDoctoral
Germany Scholarships
Graduate Scholarships
GRE Preparation
Grenada Scholarships
Hong Kong Scholarships
Hungary Scholarship
Hungry Scholarship
Iceland Scholarships
India Scholarships
Indonesia Scholarships
International Fellowship
International PhD
International Scholarships for Students
Iran Scholarships
Iraq Scholarship
Ireland Scholarships
Israel Scholarships
Italy PhD Scholarships
Jamaica Scholarships
Japan Scholarships
Kazakhstan Scholarships
Kuwait Scholarships
Lithuania Scholarship
Malaysia Scholarships
Malta
Masters Scholarships
MBA Scholarships
Mexico Scholarships
Mongolia Scholarships
Monthly Scholarships
   April Scholarships
   August Scholarships
   December Scholarships
   February Scholarships
   January Scholarships
   July Scholarships
   June Scholarships
   March Scholarships
   May Scholarships
   November Scholarships
   October Scholarships
   September Scholarships
Netherlands Scholarships
New Zealand Scholarships
Norway Scholarships
Oman Scholarship
Pakistan Scholarships
Palestine Scholarships
PhD Scholarships
Philippines Scholarships
Poland Scholarships
Postdoctoral Fellowships
Postgraduate Scholarships
Qatar Scholarship
Research Scholarships
Russia Scholarships
Samoan Scholarships
Saudi Arabia Scholarship
Scholarship News
Scholarships by Majors
   Accounting Scholarships
   Advertising Scholarships
   Agriculture Scholarships
   Anthropology Scholarships
   Archaeology Scholarships
   Architecture Scholarships
   Art Scholarships
   Biology Scholarships
   Business Scholarships
   Chemistry Scholarships
   Communication Scholarships
   Computer Science
   Cosmetology Scholarships
   Criminal Justice Scholarships
   Culinary Scholarships
   Design Scholarships
   Economics Scholarships
   Education Scholarships
   Engineering Scholarships
   English Scholarships
   Fashion Scholarships
   Film Scholarships
   Foreign Language
   History Scholarships
   Hospitality Scholarships
   Journalism Scholarships
   Law Scholarships
   Library Science Scholarships
   Literature Scholarships
   Management Scholarships
   Math Scholarships
   Mathematics Scholarships
   Medical Scholarships
   Music Scholarships
   New Media Scholarships
   Nursing Scholarships
   Nutrition Scholarships
   Philosophy Scholarships
   Photography Scholarships
   Physics Scholarships
   Religion/Theology Scholarships
   Science Scholarships
   Social Science Scholarships
   Social Work Scholarships
   Sociology Scholarships
   Theatre Scholarships
Scholarships for Developing Countries Students
Scholarships For Exchange Students
Scholarships for Kyrgyz Students
Scholarships for Women
Serbia Scholarships
Singapore Scholarships
Slovenia Scholarships
South Korea Scholarships
Spain Scholarships
Sports Scholarships
Sri Lanka Scholarships
Sweden Scholarships
Switzerland Scholarships, 2017
Syria Scholarships
Taiwan Scholarships
Thailand Scholarships
TOEFL Preparation
Turkey Scholarship
UAE Scholarships
UK Scholarships
Ukraine Scholarships
Uncategorized
Undergraduate Scholarships
USA Postdoctoral Fellowships
USA Scholarships
   Scholarships for High School Students
   USA Masters Scholarships
   USA PhD Scholarships
   USA Undergraduate
Vietnam Scholarships, 2017


 

 



Looking for Scholarships?
Get international funding options for Undergraduate, Masters, PhD and Post-Doc 
Courses.

































 

 

 
Subscribe / Connect

Subscribe to our e-mail newsletter to receive updates.










Search Free Scholarships





 Harvard Square, Mifflin Pl, Cambridge, MA 02138
521 Del Medio Ave, Mountain View, CA 94040

 









































YOUTH EMPLOYMENT SCHOLARSHIP FUND, LLC - Other- Sexauer  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









YOUTH EMPLOYMENT SCHOLARSHIP FUND, LLC

      Industry: Other
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    8235 Ohio River Boulevard  
    Pittsburgh, PA, 15202Phone: 412-776-9020 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-12-28


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Equity Only


06b 4a5


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Michael A. Sexauer 
 Executive 










>







Federal Youth Funding Agencies | Youth.gov































Skip to main content



















Featured Grant Opportunity



 Education Research and Development Center Program (Funding Opportunity...  


 







Explore Funding Search 
Explore Funding Search- Select -Funding SearchGrants.govRegister with Grants.govFederal Youth Funding Agencies
 


Help us learn what works! What does your organization do to authentically engage youth? Click here to share.


 

Funding Search
 



 



Federal Youth Funding Agencies








The federal agencies that bring you youth.gov also provide funding to address youth issues. Below are descriptions of the agencies' major funding programs. We have provided links to funding information where available.
Funding Agencies:
Corporation for National and Community Service
U.S. Department of Agriculture
U.S. Department of Commerce
U.S. Department of Defense
U.S. Department of Education
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development 
U.S. Department of the Interior
U.S. Department of Justice
U.S. Department of Labor
U.S. Department of Transportation
Corporation for National and Community Service (CNCS)
The Corporation is the nation's largest grantmaker supporting service and volunteering. The Corporation provides opportunities for young Americans to express their patriotism while addressing critical community needs.
Funding Opportunities
CNCS funding opportunities
Selected Programs and Initiatives
AmeriCorps State and AmeriCorps National support a broad range of local service programs that engage thousands of Americans in intensive service to meet critical community needs.
AmeriCorps VISTA provides full-time members to community organizations and public agencies to create and expand programs that build capacity and ultimately bring low-income individuals and communities out of poverty.
AmeriCorps National Civilian Community Corps is a full-time residential program for men and women, ages 18-24, that strengthens communities while developing leaders through direct, team-based national and community service.
Learn and Serve America. Learn and Serve America enables students to contribute to their community while building academic and civic skills. Learn and Serve America provides direct and indirect support to K-12 schools, community groups and higher education institutions to facilitate service-learning projects through grants, training and technical assistance, and research.
Social Innovation Fund. This fund helps effective nonprofits replicate their services in low-income communities.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
National Service Learning Clearinghouse. Learn and Serve America's National Service-Learning Clearinghouse supports the service-learning community in higher education, K-12, community-based organizations, tribal programs, and all others interested in strengthening schools and communities using service-learning techniques and methodologies.
Resource Center. The Resource Center is the knowledge management training and technical assistance provider to the Corporation. It connects service programs with targeted training and information.
Tribal Technical Assistance. The Corporation provides training and technical assistance to a network of Tribal service programs.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA)
USDA fosters positive youth development, supports rural and community development efforts and promotes healthy eating and nutrition. The National Institute of Food and Agriculture (NIFA) advances knowledge for agriculture, the environment, human health and well-being, and communities by supporting research, education, and extension programs in the Land-Grant University System and other partner organizations. NIFA funds research, education, and extension at the state and local levels and provides program leadership in these areas. The Food and Nutrition Service administers the food and nutrition assistance programs within USDA. FNS provides children and needy families with better access to food and a more healthful diet through its programs and nutrition education efforts. Rural Development works to eliminate substandard housing from rural America by helping citizens buy, build, or rent decent housing. The division funds the growth and creation of rural businesses and cooperatives. Other Rural Development programs help communities build or improve utilities and facilities such as schools, health clinics, and fire stations.
Funding Opportunities
Funding Opportunities at the National Institute of Food and Agriculture
Funding opportunities in Rural Development
Selected Programs and Initiatives
4-H Youth Development Program. Using research-based programming around positive youth development, 4-H youth get the hands-on real world experience they need to become leaders.
Child and Adult Care Food Program. This program provides nutritious meals and snacks to children in child care centers, at-risk afterschool programs, emergency shelters, and nonresidential adult day care centers.
Children, Youth and Families at Risk Program. CYFAR supports comprehensive, intensive, community-based programs developed with active citizen participation in all phases. CYFAR promotes building resiliency and protective factors in youth, families, and communities.
Expanded Food and Nutrition Education Program. This program helps people acquire the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and changed behavior necessary for nutritionally sound diets, and to contribute to their personal development and the improvement of the total family diet and nutritional well-being.
National School Lunch Program. This meal program des nutritionally balanced, low-cost or free lunches to children each school day in public and nonprofit private schools and residential child care institutions.
Community Facilities Direct Loan & Grant Program. This program provides affordable funding to develop essential community facilities in rural areas.
Summer Food Service Program. This program provides nutritious foods during the summer months, filling the gap when children don’t have access to free and reduced lunch through their schools.
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. Once known as “food stamps,” this program provides low-income households with electronic benefits they can use like cash at most grocery stores. Click here to find a SNAP office to fill out an application.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Children, Youth, and Families Education and Research Network (CYFERnet). CYFERnet is a national network of land grant university faculty and county Extension educators working to provide resources to community educational programs for children, youth, and families. CYFERnet works across all land-grant universities to solicit and review publications, quality research information and program materials for Children, Youth, and Families at Risk (CYFAR) staff and others implementing programs.
SNAP Outreach and Nutrition and Education Materials. Outreach materials are designed to educate low income people about the nutrition benefits of SNAP and encourage participation. Materials include posters, brochures, and flyers, among other items. Many are available in Spanish. All are free.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Commerce
The Department of Commerce has a broad mandate to advance economic growth and jobs and opportunities for the American people. It has cross cuttingresponsibilities in the areas of trade, technology, entrepreneurship, economic development, environmental stewardship and statistical research and analysis. It also houses the Census Bureau.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
2010 Census Data Products. Find out when data from the 2010 Census will be released.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Defense (DOD)
The mission of the Department of Defense is to provide the military forces needed to deter war and to protect the security of our country.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
National Guard Youth ChalleNGe Program. This program is a voluntary, preventive program designed to give at-risk youth a second chance. It accomplishes this by helping 16- to 18-year-old high school drop-outs improve their life skills, education levels and employment potential. The 17-month program includes a five-and-a-half month residential phase.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Military Youth on the Move. This website provides resources and support to children and youth who move due to a parent’s deployment.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Education (ED)
The mission of the Department of Education is to promote student achievement and preparation for global competitiveness by fostering educational excellence and ensuring equal access.
Funding Opportunities
Guide to Education Programs. To help educators, policymakers, and citizens understand ED’s programs, each year ED publishes a "Guide to U.S. Department of Education Programs."
Discretionary grant application packages lists most ED competitions that are currently open, with links to application information for each competition.
Additional funding information. Sign up for regular funding announcements through the PreventionED listserv.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Emergency Management for Higher Education. The Emergency Management for Higher Education (EMHE) grant program supports institutions of higher education (IHE) projects designed to develop, or review and improve, and fully integrate campus-based all-hazards emergency management planning efforts.
Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs (GEAR UP). This program is designed to increase the number of low-income students who are prepared to enter and succeed in postsecondary education, through providing services at high-poverty middle and high schools, and awarding college scholarships to low-income students.
Promise Neighborhoods. The program is intended to significantly improve the educational and developmental outcomes of all children in our most distressed communities, including rural and tribal communities, and to transform those communities through a "place-based" approach, which leverages investments by focusing resources in targeted places, drawing on the compounding effect of well-coordinated actions.
McKinney-Vento Education for Homeless Children and Youth Program. These grants help schools ensure that homeless children, including preschoolers and youths, have equal access to free and appropriate public education.
Safe and Drug-Free Schools. Safe and Drug Free Schools provides financial assistance for drug and violence prevention activities and programs that promote the health and well-being of students.
21st Century Community Learning Centers. This program supports the creation of community learning centers that provide academic enrichment opportunities during non-school hours for children, particularly students who attend high-poverty and low-performing schools.
Safe and Supportive Schools. This program helps State educational agencies (SEAs) support statewide measurement of, and targeted programmatic interventions to improve, conditions for learning in order to help schools improve safety and reduce substance use.
Project SERV. This program funds short-term and long-term education-related services for local educational agencies (LEAs) and institutions of higher education (IHEs) to help them recover from a violent or traumatic event in which the learning environment has been disrupted.
Elementary and Secondary School Counseling Programs. This program provides funding to local educational agencies (LEAs) to establish or expand elementary and secondary school counseling programs.
Readiness and Emergency Management for Schools. This grant program supports efforts by local educational agencies (LEAs) to create, strengthen, and improve emergency management plans at the district and school-building levels, including training school personnel on emergency management procedures; communicating with parents about emergency plans and procedures; and coordinating with local law enforcement, public safety or emergency management, public health, and mental health agencies and local government.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Higher Education Center for Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse and Violence Prevention. The Center is ED's primary provider of services in alcohol and other drug abuse and violence prevention in higher education founded upon state-of-the-art knowledge and research-based strategies.
Parent Information Centers. Parent Centers serve families of children of all ages with all disabilities; physical, cognitive, behavioral, social, and emotional. They provide training and information to parents of infants, toddlers, children, and youth with disabilities and to professionals who work with them.
Readiness and Emergency Management for Schools Technical Assistance Center. The Center provides emergency management resources, training, and publications, and helps schools with improving and strengthening their emergency management plans.
Order ED Publications. ED Pubs offers more than 6,000 titles. Items include brochures, CD–ROMs, grant applications, newsletters, posters, research reports, videotapes and financial aid products.
National Center for School Crisis and Bereavement. This technical assistance center serves as a resource for information, training materials, consultation and technical assistance for school systems, professional training programs, professional organizations, governmental and non-governmental agencies, communities, children's groups and projects in the areas of crisis and loss.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (HHS)
A number of divisions and offices within HHS support the health, public health, and human services needs of children and youth and their families, including the Administration for Children and Families (ACF), Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), Health Resources Services Administration (HRSA), Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA), Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS), Indian Health Service (IHS), and Office of Adolescent Health(OAH).
Funding Opportunities
Grants.gov. HHS shares its grant opportunities through Grants.gov. Some offices also offer web sites with their opportunities listed. Visit ACF funding opportunities, HRSA funding opportunities, and SAMHSA funding opportunities to learn more.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Assets for Independence. These projects help participants save earned income in special-purpose, matched savings accounts called Individual Development Accounts (IDAs). Every dollar in savings deposited into an IDA by participants is matched (from $1 to $8 combined Federal and nonfederal funds) by the AFI project, promoting savings and enabling participants to acquire a lasting asset, such as postsecondary education.
Chafee Foster Care Independence Program (CFCIP). This program seeks to ensure that young people involved in the foster care system receive services and support to help them make a successful transition to self-sufficiency and adulthood.
Mentoring Children of Prisoners. Through this program, community based organizations provide mentors to children and youth with incarcerated parents.
Runaway and Homeless Youth. Transitional Living Programs help homeless youth ages 16-21 make a successful transition to self-sufficient living through long-term residential services and wraparound supports. Basic Center Programs provide youth up to age 18 with emergency shelter, food, clothing, counseling and referrals for health care.
Safe Schools/Healthy Students. The SS/HS Initiative is a unique Federal grant-making program designed to prevent violence and substance abuse among our Nation's youth, schools, and communities. The initiative provides schools and communities with enhanced school and community-based services in an effort to strengthen healthy child development, thus reducing violent behavior and substance use.
Systems of Care. This program supports coordinated networks of community-based services and supports that are organized to meet the challenges of children and youth with serious mental health needs and their families. Families and youth work in partnership with public and private organizations to design mental health services and supports that are effective, that build on the strengths of individuals, and that address each person’s cultural and linguistic needs.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Adolescent and School Health. This resource provides fact sheets and surveillance data summaries (including state-by-state data) on teen pregnancy and HIV/AIDS and other sexually transmitted diseases.
Healthy Schools, Healthy Youth! This website provides a wealth of information, tools, and publications on adolescent school health, broader health topics (e.g., obesity, physical activity, injury and violence, alcohol and drug use, tobacco use), as well as data, statistics, and surveillance activities related to these health topics.
National Adolescent Health Information Center. This resource provides adolescent health information and research to assist in the integration, synthesis, coordination and dissemination of adolescent health-related information.
National Center for Mental Health Promotion and Youth Violence Prevention. This Center provides technical assistance and training to school districts and communities to enable grantees to plan, implement, evaluate, and sustain activities that foster resilience, promote mental health, and prevent youth violence and mental and behavioral disorders.
National Center for Trauma-Informed Care. This center builds awareness of trauma-informed care and promoting the implementation of trauma-informed practices in programs and services.
National Clearinghouse on Families and Youth. This clearinghouse contains information about programs in the areas of youth development, family violence prevention, mentoring children of prisoners, and abstinence education.
MentalHealth.gov. This online resource provides information about mental health.
Homelessness and Housing. This webpage developed by SAMHSA serves as a resource for both researchers and practitioners for information regarding multiple aspects of homelessness, including both physical (i.e. violence and finding housing) and psychological needs (i.e. trauma and stress).
National Resource Center for Youth Services (NRCYS). This center provides training and technical assistance to public and private youth serving organizations across the nation.
Suicide Prevention Resource Center (SPRC).This resource provides a public health approach to preventing premature deaths due to suicide in the United States.
STRYVE. STRYVE, or Striving To Reduce Youth Violence Everywhere, is a national initiative led by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) to prevent youth violence before it starts. STRYVE seeks to increase awareness that youth violence can and should be prevented and to promote the use of prevention strategies based on the best available evidence.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD)
Youth are a large proportion of the residents of public housing developments. Divisions of HUD like Public and Indian Housing and Community Planning and Development provide a variety of supports to support children and youth, as well as their families.
Funding Opportunities
HUD funding opportunities
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Choice Neighborhoods. This initiative will transform distressed neighborhoods and public and assisted projects into viable and sustainable mixed-income neighborhoods by linking housing improvements with appropriate services, schools, public assets, transportation, and access to jobs. A strong emphasis will be placed on local community planning for access to high-quality educational opportunities, including early childhood education.
Resident Opportunities and Self Sufficiency (ROSS). ROSS links public housing residents with supportive services, resident empowerment activities, and assistance in becoming economically self-sufficient.
Neighborhood Networks. In addition to its support for adults, this program provides youth with educational afterschool activities and mentoring programs.
VASH Vouchers. Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing Vouchers aim to reduce the number of homeless veterans.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
HUD State Contacts
Low Rent Apartment Search. Enter your city and state to find a list of affordable apartments in your area.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of the Interior (DOI)
The U.S. Department of the Interior supports youth through a number of agencies and offices – including the Office on Youth in the Great Outdoors, the Bureau of Indian Affairs.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Bureau of Indian Education Primary and Secondary Schools. BIE oversees a total of 183 elementary and secondary schools, located on 64 reservations in 23 states. Of these, 59 are BIE-operated and 124 are Tribally-operated under BIE contracts or grants. The Bureau also funds or operates off-reservation boarding schools and peripheral dormitories near reservations for students attending public schools.
Conservation Corps Network. The Network provides opportunities for young adults from diverse backgrounds to work on conservation projects such as maintenance and construction, habitat management, and visitor services. Corps members learn about potential career pathways and enjoy mentoring, training, and leadership development opportunities.
Public Land Corps (ages 16-25). Through the Public Land Corps, youth help to restore, protect, and rehabilitate national parks through work projects, while learning about environmental issues and the national parks. Individuals are recruited and supervised by one of the many non-profit organizations partnering with the National Park Service.
Youth Conservation Corps (ages 15-18). Through the Youth Conservation Corps, youth work to protect the natural, cultural, and historical resources of your national parks through rewarding work projects.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Operation Safe and Secure Schools. The Operation Safe and Secure Schools’ Team (OSASS) continues to work diligently in providing the safest learning environment possible for all Bureau of Indian Education (BIE) students and staff. Throughout the year, OSASS has provided training to schools throughout the country. The Team has visited many of our school sites to conduct safety procedure reviews, provide technical assistance, and update or complete many national policies directed toward the improvement of the safety at our schools.
Online Training Courses. The Bureau of Indian Education has developed a series of staff development online courses covering topics related to school safety, security, and substance abuse prevention.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ)
Several agencies within the Department of Justice focus on issues related to youth, including the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention (OJJDP), Office on Violence Against Women (OWV), and National Institute of Justice (NIJ). OJJDP provides national leadership, coordination, and resources to prevent and respond to juvenile delinquency and victimization, and helps to improve the juvenile justice system's ability to protect public safety, hold offenders accountable, and provide treatment and rehabilitative services tailored to juveniles and their families. OVW is responsible for coordination with other departments, agencies, and offices regarding all activities authorized or undertaken under the Violence Against Women Act of 1994 and the Violence Against Women Act of 2000. NIJ is the research, development and evaluation agency of the U.S. Department of Justice.
Funding Opportunities
Grant opportunities at the Office on Violence Against Women
Youth-focused grant opportunities at the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Coordinating Council on Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention. The Council is an independent organization in the executive branch that coordinates federal juvenile delinquency prevention programs, federal programs and activities that detain or care for unaccompanied juveniles, and federal programs relating to missing and exploited children.
Gang Reduction Program. As part of DOJ's Anti-Gang Initiative, OJJDP’s Gang Reduction Program is designed to reduce gang activity in targeted neighborhoods by incorporating a broad spectrum of research-based interventions to address the range of personal, family, and community factors that contribute to juvenile delinquency and gang activity.
Girls Study Group. The Girls Study Group assists OJJDP in understanding risk and protective factors associated with female juvenile offending and the consequences for youth involved in such offending. It also identifies effective strategies for communities to use in their efforts to prevent and reduce female involvement in delinquency and violence.
Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Program. This program helps state and local law enforcement agencies develop an effective response to cyber enticement and child pornography cases, including forensic and investigative components, training and technical assistance, victim services, and community education.
Juvenile Accountability Block Grants Program. This program seeks to reduce juvenile offending through both offender-focused and system-focused activities that promote accountability.
Tribal Youth Program. This program helps tribal communities prevent juvenile delinquency, reduce violent crime, and improve tribal juvenile justice systems.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
CCIToolsforFeds.org. This toolkit provides federal staff who work with Comprehensive Community Initiatives (CCIs) with information about designing evaluations, technical assistance, collaborative processes, and other resources to supports CCIs. The information it contains will also be valuable to technical-assistance providers, evaluators, private funders, and community groups.
National Training and Technical Assistance Center. This Center promotes the use of evidence-based practices by providing practitioners with innovative training and technical assistance to meet the diverse needs of youth in the juvenile justice system, to reduce juvenile delinquency and crime, and to ensure the safe and equal treatment of all youth in the juvenile justice system.
National Gang Center. This website features the latest research about gangs; descriptions of evidence-based, anti-gang programs; and links to tools, databases, and other resources to assist in developing and implementing effective community-based gang prevention, intervention, and suppression strategies. Youth gang information is also provided on this website.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Labor (DOL)
Several agencies within the Department of Labor support youth employment and training efforts. The Employment and Training Administration (ETA) administers federal government job training and worker dislocation programs, federal grants to states for public employment service programs, and unemployment insurance benefits. These services are primarily provided through state and local workforce development systems. As part of their overall mission, the Office of Disability Employment Policy supports workforce development strategies for youth with disabilities.
Funding Opportunities
Grant opportunities at the Department of Labor
Youth-focused grant opportunities at the Employment and Training Administration
Grant opportunities at the Office of Disability Employment Policy
Selected Programs and Initiatives
High Growth Youth Offender Initiative. This initiative provides occupational training, on-the-job training, apprenticeships, internships, and other work-based learning to help former offenders gain the skills necessary to enter high-growth high-demand industries. Projects will focus on addressing the workforce needs of growing industries that provide employment opportunities and potential for advancement.
Job Corps. Job Corps is a free education and training program that helps young people 16 and older learn a career, earn a high school diploma or GED, and find and keep a good job.
Persistently Dangerous Schools. This limited grant program aimed to enhance education and career opportunities in troubled high schools. Six school districts were eligible to apply based on being self identified as “persistently dangerous” by the U.S. Department of Education due to high levels of persistently high levels of violence.
School District Youth Offender Initiative. This program supported the development of strategies for reducing youth involvement in gangs using a workforce development approach.
Youth Build. YouthBuild provides job training and educational opportunities for at-risk youth ages 16-24 while constructing or rehabilitating affordable housing for low-income or homeless families in their own neighborhoods. Youth split their time between the construction site and the classroom, where they earn their GED or high school diploma, learn to be community leaders, and prepare for college and other postsecondary training opportunities.
Clearinghouses and Technical Assistance
Career Information from the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS). This website matches youth interests with career pathways.
Disability Employment Policy Resources for Youth. This resource offers information about the five Guideposts for Success – key educational and career development interventions that can make a positive difference in the lives of all youth, including youth with disabilities.
National Collaborative on Workforce and Disability. This technical assistance center offers a range of technical assistance services to state and local workforce investment boards, youth councils and other workforce development system youth programs to better serve all youth, including youth with disabilities and other disconnected youth.
One-Stop Career Center. Helping youth and adults, one-stop career centers provide job seekers with career exploration services, skills assessment and development, interview and resume preparation, and more.
Savings Fitness — A Guide to Your Money and Your Financial Future(PDF). This resource helps users plan for your future financial goals.
YouthRules! With resources for teens, parents, educators, and employers, this site provides Federal and state labor law information.
Back to top ^
U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT)
The mission of the Department of Transportation is to serve the United States by ensuring a fast, safe, efficient, accessible and convenient transportation system that meets our vital national interests and enhances the quality of life of the American people, today and into the future. The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration works to promote motor vehicle and highway safety by working to reduce impaired and distracted driving, as well as support driver education efforts.
Selected Programs and Initiatives
Community How-To Guide on Underage Drinking Prevention. This resource helps communities plan and implement a comprehensive underage drinking prevention program.
Distracted Driving. This website raises awareness about the risks of distracted driving, including texting while driving.
Parental Responsibility Toolkit. This site provides marketing and earned media tools for the Parental Responsibility Toolkit. NHTSA has developed a three-tiered strategy to prevent motor-vehicle-related deaths and injuries of teens by increasing seat belt use, implementing graduated driver licensing laws, and reducing teens' access to alcohol and drugs through parental responsibility and parents setting house rules.
Teen Drivers. This campaign seeks to promote teen driver safety by promoting seat belt use, the adoption of graduated driver licensing policies, the reduction of underage drinking, and increased parental involvement.
 









 








Subscribe to E-Newsletter


 



 

Share Content







 

Find opportunities and resources for youth! 


"Change starts with one person and can grow really fast." - Tristan
engage.youth.gov



 


























 











 Youth Development












































About Daniels Fund


Mission & Charitable Giving
Donor Intent
Core Values
From the President


A Message from Linda Childears
The Business of Giving Blog



Board of Directors


Our Board
Jim Nicholson, Board Chair
Tony Acone
Hank Brown
Linda Childears
Brian Deevy
John Fitzgerald
Francisco Garcia
Gayle Greer
James Griesemer
Thomas Marinkovich
John Suthers
June Travis
Leroy Williams



News
Videos
Annual Reports
Form 990-PF Filings
Veterans: Because of You

Staff


Management Bios
Staff Directory



Careers

Contact Us



About Bill Daniels


Biography
Life & Legacy of Bill Daniels Book
Bill Daniels' Values



Grants


Grants Program Overview
Funding Areas


Aging
Amateur Sports
Disabilities
Drug & Alcohol Addiction 
Early Childhood Education
Homeless & Disadvantaged
K-12 Education
Youth Development



Eligibility & Guidelines
Frequently Asked Questions

Grants Team



Scholarships


Scholarship Program Overview
Daniels Scholarship Program


Daniels Scholarship Program Overview
Partner Schools
Apply
Choosing a College



For Daniels Scholars


Daniels Scholar Portal
Scholar E-mail Login
Scholar Alumni


Alumni Program Overview
Alumni Update Contact Form



Scholar Success Program
Career Planning 



For Parents of Daniels Scholars


Information for Parents
Resources
Tips for Fall
Tips for Spring
Tips for Summer



Boundless Opportunity Scholarship


Boundless Opportunity Scholarship Overview
Participating Schools



Scholarship Team
Scholar Relations Officers



Ethics


Daniels Fund Ethics Initiative Overview
Bill Daniels & Ethics
Collegiate Program
High School Program
Law Enforcement Program
Case Bank



Meeting Space


Meeting Space Overview
Details & Specifics


Meeting Rooms
Eligibility Criteria
Set Up, Clean Up, & Services
Catering Options



Schedule / Cancel


How to Schedule or Cancel
Meeting Space Request Form



Location & Map



Impact


Impact of the Daniels Fund










Grants
Investing in outstanding nonprofit organizations
      in Colorado, New Mexico, Utah, and Wyoming











 


Grants Program Overview 



Funding Areas


 » Aging

 » Amateur Sports
 » Disabilities
 » Drug & Alcohol Addiction
 » Early Childhood Education
 » Homeless & Disadvantaged
 » K-12 Education Reform
 » Youth Development






Eligibility & Guidelines
Frequently Asked Questions
Grants Team


 













          “I have supported young people all my life.
	        I enjoy sharing my good fortune with others,
	       especially young people with talent and drive.” 





	Bill Daniels’ Motivation

	Bill supported character-building programs that help youth become confident, patriotic, and independent. He wanted kids to develop personal accountability and responsibility. He also wanted them to understand the value of money, the free enterprise system, and that success is earned through hard work.

	Our Strategy

	Support efforts that help young people develop character, and gain the necessary skills to become productive, engaged citizens grateful to live in a free country.

	Desired Outcomes


Career & Technical Education
All youth — whether planning to earn a college degree or not — develop clear pathways to meaningful employment through opportunities for career exploration, job shadowing, internships, and apprenticeships.


Civic Engagement
Youth actively contribute to bettering their communities as engaged, informed citizens with strong American values.


Financial Literacy & Free Enterprise
Youth become active participants in the free enterprise system by developing a strong understanding of economics, business, financial literacy, and entrepreneurship.
















About Daniels Fund | About Bill Daniels | Grants | Scholarships 
Ethics | 
		   Meeting Space |  Impact | Contact Us



			   101 Monroe Street  
				 Denver, Colorado 80206 
Phone:  (303) 393-7220   |   (877) 791-4726  Toll free
Email: [email protected]








			Copyright © 2017 Daniels Fund. All Rights Reserved. Our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.
		











Cyprus Scholarships 2017 Scholarship Positions 2017 2018

























































Navigation






Scholarship Positions 2017 2018
2017 Online College University Scholarships PhD Masters Graduate Financial Aid Positions Free


Best Grants, Scholarships & Financial Aid for College & University Students

 













 
Home > Cyprus ScholarshipsCyprus ScholarshipsCyprus Scholarships 2017 | Cyprus PhD Scholarships | Cyprus Scholarships 2017 | Cyprus Scholarships For International Students 2017 | Cyprus Scholarships For Developing Countries | Cyprus Scholarships For International Students 2017


Email me college scholarships like this. Be the first to apply.

























 
PhD Scholarship for EU Applicants at Roosevelt Institute for American Studies in Netherlands, 2017 


Roosevelt Institute for American Studies, Netherlands 


Roosevelt Institute for American Studies is happy to announce its PhD Scholarships starting from 1 November 2017. Applicants from EU countries are eligible to apply for this scholarship program. The RIAS is a graduate school, library, research and conference center for […]



Continue Reading 


 
Three-year PhD Scholarships in Cultural Sciences at Fondazione Collegio San Carlo in Italy, 2017-2018 


The Fondazione Collegio San Carlo di Modena, Italy 


­Applications are invited for scholarships for a three-year PhD scholarship in Cultural Sciences open to European citizens at the Fondazione Collegio San Carlo for a 2017-2018 academic year. The School is residential and aims to provide high-level interdisciplinary training in […]



Continue Reading 


 
EEA and Norway Grants Fund for Youth Employment, 2017 


The EEA Grants and Norway Grants, Europe 


With this call, The EEA Grants and Norway Grants Fund for young, ambitious applicants to pursue research programme. The fund aims to support measures that promote youth employment across Europe. The EEA Grants and Norway Grants are the financial contributions […]



Continue Reading 


 
Fully Funded Erasmus Mundus SUNBEAM Scholarship Programme at Partner Universities, 2017 


SUNBEAM 


Applications are invited for fully funded Erasmus Mundus SUNBEAM Scholarship Programme open for post-doctorate candidates only. Applicants from EU countries are eligible to apply for this scholarship program. The Erasmus Mundus program’s overall aim is to promote European higher education, to help […]



Continue Reading 


 
Kiel University International Scholarships to Study in Europe, Asia and North America, 2017 


Kiel University, Germany 


The Kiel University is offering International Scholarships to study in Europe, Asia and North America. These scholarships are open in all the academic subjects offered by the partner institutions. The aim of the scholarships is to enhance international exchange. The International […]



Continue Reading 


 
100% Scholarship for Masters Programme at MIB Trieste School of Management in Italy, 2017 


MIB Trieste School of Management, Italy 


In memory of Diego Garcia-Sastre Assicurazioni Generali S.p.A. offers 100% scholarship to pursue Master in Insurance and Risk Management by MIB Trieste School of Management. Citizens of member countries of the European Union are eligible to apply for this scholarship programme. […]



Continue Reading 


 
Fully Funded Archaeology Postgraduate Studentship at University of Bradford in UK, 2017/2018 


University of Bristol, United Kingdom 


The University of Bradford is inviting applications for fully funded Archaeology Postgraduate Studentship for students starting their course in September 2017. The studentship is available to pursue postgraduate programme. The aim of the studentship is to provide funding to high-quality […]



Continue Reading 


 
New PhD Bursaries for EU Applicants at DCU’s Institute of Education in Ireland, 2017 


Dublin City University, Ireland 


DCU’s Institute of Education is pleased to offer six new PhD bursaries for part-time studies with fees waived for the five years of their studies. This bursary is open to EU citizens only. The Dublin City University aims to lead the […]



Continue Reading 


 
UrbanVolt Masters Scholarship Programme for EU Students at Dublin City University in Ireland, 2017 


Dublin City University, Ireland 


Dublin City University and UrbanVolt have joined forces to launch an exciting Master’s Scholarship programme available across the University’s Engineering, Computing and Business schools.  Students from EU countries are eligible to apply for this scholarship. The Dublin City University aims […]



Continue Reading 


 
EACVI Training Grants for International Students in Europe, 2017 


The European Society of Cardiology,  Europe 


The European Society of Cardiology (ESC) is inviting applicants for EACVI Training Grants in Europe for the academic session of 2017. These grants are available for the students from ESC Member country or an ESC Affiliated Member Country for pursuing […]



Continue Reading 



Rothamsted Research PhD Studentship for Students from EU Countries in UK, 2017 


Rothamsted Research, United Kingdom 


Rothamsted Research and Cranfield University are jointly funding studentship opportunities for students from EU countries. The studentship is available for pursuing PhD programme at Rothamsted Research. The aim is to accelerate innovation by bringing together engineers, information technologists, natural scientists […]



Continue Reading 


 
Taught Postgraduate Scholarships within the Faculty of Science and Engineering at University of Limerick in Ireland, 2017-2018 


University of Limerick, Ireland 


The University of Limerick is offering Faculty of Science and Engineering Taught Postgraduate Programme Scholarships commencing in AY2017/2018. The successful candidates will receive the scholarship in the form of a reduced fee paid directly to the fees office. The University […]



Continue Reading 


 
UB Business School Executive MBA Scholarships for Students from EU Countries in Spain, 2017 


University of Barcelona Business School, Spain 


The University of Barcelona  Business School is pleased to announce its scholarship scheme for EU students to study Executive MBA. The main aim of this scholarship scheme is to reward students with proven track record of professional practice, entrepreneur initiative and […]



Continue Reading 


 
Haaga-Helia Scholarship for Bachelors and Masters Programme in Finland, 2017 


Haaga-Helia University of Applied Sciences, Finland 


Applications are invited for Haaga-Helia Scholarship to pursue bachelors and master degree programme. Students from EU as well as EEA countries are eligible to apply for this scholarship programme. Through education, research and development, Haaga-Helia prepares professionals for business and […]



Continue Reading 


 
Fee Waivers and PhD Scholarships for EU Students at University of Limerick in Ireland, 2017 


University of Limerick, Ireland 


The Faculty of Arts, Humanities & Social Sciences at the University of Limerick, Ireland, is offering a number of Fee Waivers and Scholarships to PhD candidates on a competitive basis. As a leading Irish Business School in a public university […]



Continue Reading 

1
2
…
4
Next →



Sponsored Links











 



 



Looking for Scholarships?
Get international funding options for Undergraduate, Masters, PhD and Post-Doc 
Courses.

































 


 

Popular Latest Tags 




 Zenith International Undergraduate Scholarships at Robert Gordon University in UK, 2017
July 25, 2017



 PhD Scholarship for International Students at Polish Academy of Sciences, 2017
July 24, 2017



 KLK Graduate Scholarship for Malaysian Applicants, 2017
July 24, 2017



 NEC C&C Foundation-Grants for Non-Japanese Researchers at Saitama University in Japan, 2018
July 24, 2017



 Full NZ-China NCD PhD Scholarships at University of Auckland in New Zealand, 2018
July 24, 2017





 Government of Hong Kong Scholarships for English Teachers, 2017-2018
July 28, 2017



 ACIS Cassamarca Scholarships for Postgraduate Research in Italy, 2018
July 28, 2017



 Faculty of Medicin Doctoral Grant at University of Antwerp in Belgium, 2017
July 28, 2017



 Foundation Edu Scholarship at University of Ghana, 2017
July 28, 2017



 Fully Funded UNAOC Young Peacebuilders in MENA  Programme in Jordan, 2017
July 28, 2017




2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016
2017
2018
Australia
Business
Canada
College
Denmark
Doctoral
Engineering
EU
Featured
Fellowship
Fellowships
Germany
Graduate
India
International
Law
Management
Master
Masters
New Zealand
PhD
Postdoctoral
Postgraduate
research
Scholarship
Scholarships
Science
Sciences
students
Studentship
Sweden
Technology
UK
Undergraduate
University
Updated Scholarships
USA 


  Featured Scholarships50 International Scholarships for Short Courses at ESE in Madrid Campus, 2017Merit Scholarships for International Undergraduate Students at University of Vermont in USA, 2018International Graduate Student Scholarships at Universiti Putra Malaysia, 2017-2018NUS Data Science Scholarships for International Students in Singapore, 2017University of Miami Scholarships for International Students in USA, 2017 





 Free Online Courses (MOOC)Eindhoven University of Technology Free Online Course on Process Mining in HealthcareFree Online Course on Data Explosion and its Impact on Fraud DetectionUniversity of Edinburgh Free Online Course on Social WellbeingFree Online Course on Quality Improvement in HealthcareHarvard 
 Undergraduate Degree ScholarshipsParamedicine/Nursing Scholarships at Australian Catholic University, 2017Science and Technology Undergraduate Scholarships in Filipino Students, 2018Cunningham Undergraduate Bursaries at City University London in UK, 2017/2018Full and Half Tuition Excellence Scholarships at Pinehurst School in New Zealand, 2017 
Applying for Scholarships in 2017-2018?
Apply for top 2017-18 scholarships and financial aid positions before application deadlines.
2017-2018 Scholarships
Featured Scholarships

 

 
 

100% MBA Scholarships
Study Abroad
Read More








Search Free Scholarships


 



Our Mission Change lives of international students by helping them achieving successful scholarships, financial aid and free education. 
About Us Scholarship-Positions.com was started in 2007 by Oxford University graduates for helping international students in finding suitable scholarships to study abroad.
We have helped thousands of students in securing scholarships and financial aid in the world's top universities.
Our objective is to help international students in finding matching scholarships - just in time

 

 InternshipsCategoriesCategories
Select Category
Afghanistan Scholarships
Africa Scholarships
   Albania Scholarships
   Algeria Scholarships
   Angola Scholarships
   Benin Scholarships
   Botswana Scholarships
   Burkina Faso Scholarships
   Burundi Scholarships
   Cameroon Scholarships
   Cape Verde Scholarships
   Central African Republic
   Chad Scholarships
   Comoros Scholarships
   Congo Republic
   Djibouti Scholarships
   Egypt Scholarships
   Equatorial Guinea
   Eritrea Scholarships
   Ethiopia Scholarships
   Gabon Scholarships
   Gambia Scholarships
   Ghana Scholarships
   Guinea Scholarships
   Guinea-Bissau Scholarships
   Ivory Coast Scholarships
   Kenya Scholarships
   Lesotho Scholarships
   Liberia Scholarships
   Libya Scholarships
   Madagascar Scholarships
   Malawi Scholarships
   Mali Scholarships
   Mauritania Scholarships
   Mauritius Scholarships
   Morocco Scholarships
   Mozambique Scholarships
   Namibia Scholarships
   Niger Scholarships
   Rwanda Scholarships
   Sao Tome and Principe
   Scholarships For Nigerians
   Senegal Scholarships
   Seychelles Scholarships
   Sierra Leone Scholarships
   Somalia Scholarships
   South Africa Scholarships
   Sudan Scholarships
   Swaziland Scholarships
   Tanzania Scholarships
   Togo Scholarships
   Tunisia Scholarships
   Uganda Scholarships
   Zambia Scholarships
   Zimbabwe Scholarships
Armenian Scholarships
Australia Scholarships
Austria Scholarships
Awards and Grants
Azerbaijan Scholarships
Bangladesh Scholarships
Barbados Scholarships
Belgium Scholarships
Bhutan Scholarships
Brazil Scholarships
Cambodia Scholarships
Canada Scholarships
China Scholarships
College Scholarships
Competitions
Computer Science PhD Programmes
Cuba Scholarships
Cyprus Scholarships
Czech Republic Scholarships
Denmark Scholarships
Distance Learning Scholarships
Ecology Scholarships
Essay Competitions
Estonia Scholarship
Featured Scholarships
Filipino Scholarships
Finland Scholarships
France Scholarships
Free Courses
Georgia Scholarships
Germany PhDs
Germany PostDoctoral
Germany Scholarships
Graduate Scholarships
GRE Preparation
Grenada Scholarships
Hong Kong Scholarships
Hungary Scholarship
Hungry Scholarship
Iceland Scholarships
India Scholarships
Indonesia Scholarships
International Fellowship
International PhD
International Scholarships for Students
Iran Scholarships
Iraq Scholarship
Ireland Scholarships
Israel Scholarships
Italy PhD Scholarships
Jamaica Scholarships
Japan Scholarships
Kazakhstan Scholarships
Kuwait Scholarships
Lithuania Scholarship
Malaysia Scholarships
Malta
Masters Scholarships
MBA Scholarships
Mexico Scholarships
Mongolia Scholarships
Monthly Scholarships
   April Scholarships
   August Scholarships
   December Scholarships
   February Scholarships
   January Scholarships
   July Scholarships
   June Scholarships
   March Scholarships
   May Scholarships
   November Scholarships
   October Scholarships
   September Scholarships
Netherlands Scholarships
New Zealand Scholarships
Norway Scholarships
Oman Scholarship
Pakistan Scholarships
Palestine Scholarships
PhD Scholarships
Philippines Scholarships
Poland Scholarships
Postdoctoral Fellowships
Postgraduate Scholarships
Qatar Scholarship
Research Scholarships
Russia Scholarships
Samoan Scholarships
Saudi Arabia Scholarship
Scholarship News
Scholarships by Majors
   Accounting Scholarships
   Advertising Scholarships
   Agriculture Scholarships
   Anthropology Scholarships
   Archaeology Scholarships
   Architecture Scholarships
   Art Scholarships
   Biology Scholarships
   Business Scholarships
   Chemistry Scholarships
   Communication Scholarships
   Computer Science
   Cosmetology Scholarships
   Criminal Justice Scholarships
   Culinary Scholarships
   Design Scholarships
   Economics Scholarships
   Education Scholarships
   Engineering Scholarships
   English Scholarships
   Fashion Scholarships
   Film Scholarships
   Foreign Language
   History Scholarships
   Hospitality Scholarships
   Journalism Scholarships
   Law Scholarships
   Library Science Scholarships
   Literature Scholarships
   Management Scholarships
   Math Scholarships
   Mathematics Scholarships
   Medical Scholarships
   Music Scholarships
   New Media Scholarships
   Nursing Scholarships
   Nutrition Scholarships
   Philosophy Scholarships
   Photography Scholarships
   Physics Scholarships
   Religion/Theology Scholarships
   Science Scholarships
   Social Science Scholarships
   Social Work Scholarships
   Sociology Scholarships
   Theatre Scholarships
Scholarships for Developing Countries Students
Scholarships For Exchange Students
Scholarships for Kyrgyz Students
Scholarships for Women
Serbia Scholarships
Singapore Scholarships
Slovenia Scholarships
South Korea Scholarships
Spain Scholarships
Sports Scholarships
Sri Lanka Scholarships
Sweden Scholarships
Switzerland Scholarships, 2017
Syria Scholarships
Taiwan Scholarships
Thailand Scholarships
TOEFL Preparation
Turkey Scholarship
UAE Scholarships
UK Scholarships
Ukraine Scholarships
Uncategorized
Undergraduate Scholarships
USA Postdoctoral Fellowships
USA Scholarships
   Scholarships for High School Students
   USA Masters Scholarships
   USA PhD Scholarships
   USA Undergraduate
Vietnam Scholarships, 2017


 

 



Looking for Scholarships?
Get international funding options for Undergraduate, Masters, PhD and Post-Doc 
Courses.

































 

 

 
Subscribe / Connect

Subscribe to our e-mail newsletter to receive updates.










Search Free Scholarships





 Harvard Square, Mifflin Pl, Cambridge, MA 02138
521 Del Medio Ave, Mountain View, CA 94040

 







































Summer Youth Program Fund 2016 Grants
































































































 

















 




























Menu








							Twitter
						



							Facebook
						






Home > News > More Than 63,000 Marion County Youth to Benefit from $2.6 Million in Grants from The Summer Youth Program Fund 






More Than 63,000 Marion County Youth to Benefit from $2.6 Million in Grants from The Summer Youth Program Fund
Posted April 20, 2016 by CICF
 









 

SUMMER YOUTH PROGRAM FUND supports summer programs, including arts, career exploration and employment, community service, sports and more  
The Summer Youth Program Fund, a collaborative of 11 local and national partners, will provide $2,602,193 in grants to support programs at 178 organizations in Marion County. The grants will fund 223 low- or no-cost summertime programs, activities and experiences for more than 63,000 area children age 4 to 19. Activities include sports, overnight camping, career exploration, youth employment, community service, college access and academic enrichment.
Founded in 1995 by The Indianapolis Foundation, an affiliate of Central Indiana Community Foundation, and Lilly Endowment Inc., the Summer Youth Program Fund was the first funding collaborative dedicated to summer youth programs in the United States. Since 1995, the collaborative has contributed more than $44 million in general operating and capital support to Marion County organizations that provide summertime programs that enrich the lives of young people and strengthen Indianapolis neighborhoods.
The 2016 funding partners include: Allen Whitehill Clowes Charitable Foundation, Inc.; Christel DeHaan Family Foundation; City of Indianapolis DMD/HUD; Eli Lilly and Company; Indiana University Health; Kroger Central Division; Lilly Endowment Inc.; Nina Mason Pulliam Charitable Trust; The Clowes Fund, Inc.; and The Indianapolis Foundation.
 
See below for a full list of The Summer Youth Program Fund’s grant allocations
 
ABOUT SUMMER YOUTH PROGRAM FUND
Summer Youth Program Fund (SYPF) is a funding collaborative that supports summer programming for Marion County youth by providing grants, coordinating professional development opportunities, disseminating community information, and supporting National Summer Learning Day. SYPF includes private and public funders, such as the City of Indianapolis and family, corporate and community foundations of varying sizes and scopes.
 
ABOUT THE INDIANAPOLIS FOUNDATION
Summer Youth Program Fund (SYPF) is a funding collaborative that supports summer programming for Marion County youth by providing grants, coordinating professional development opportunities, disseminating community information, and supporting National Summer Learning Day. SYPF includes private and public funders, such as the City of Indianapolis and family, corporate and community foundations of varying sizes and scopes.
 
ABOUT CENTRAL INDIANA COMMUNITY FOUNDATION
Central Indiana Community Foundation (CICF) is a $701 million public foundation transforming the lives of central Indiana residents in three ways: consulting donors, family foundations and their professional advisors on charitable giving; awarding grants to effective not-for-profit organizations; and providing leadership to address community needs and seize opportunities. CICF was established in 1997 as a partnership between The Indianapolis Foundation, serving Marion County since 1916, and Legacy Fund, serving Hamilton County since 1991. For more information about CICF, visit cicf.org, or contact Christy Glesing, APR, Well Done Marketing, 317.667.5991.
 
The Summer Youth Program Fund grant allocations 




Organization


Project/ Program


Award Amount



100 Black Men of Indianapolis, Inc.
100 Black Men of Indianapolis Summer Academy
$46,500


Adult and Child Mental Health Center
Kamp Kool
$15,000


Aftercare for Indiana through Mentoring, Inc. (AIM)
Crossroads Summer Youth Employment Program
$10,000


Agape Therapeutic Riding Resources, Inc.
Summer Youth Vocational Leadership Program
$7,500


All Souls Unitarian Church
A Freedom School for Indianapolis
$5,500


Always Making Progress, Inc.
Power-UP Summer Program
$3,000


American Diabetes Association
Camp John Warvel – ADA Diabetes Camp
$13,000


Anglican Cathedral Church of the Resurrection
Involve the Kids Summer Program
$5,500


Art With a Heart Inc.
Emphasizing Art
$24,500


ArtMix
Urban Artisans
$14,500


Asante Children’s Theatre, Inc.
Prep4Life
$10,500


AYS, Inc.
Future 200
$2,500


Benjamin Harrison Presidential Site
Future Presidents of America 2016
$2,500


Big Brothers Big Sisters Central Indiana
Adult-to-Youth Mentoring Program
$5,500


Big Car Media
Wagon of Wonders
$4,000


Bosma Industries for the Blind
Student Training and Education Program
$5,000


Boy Scouts of America
After School Scouting Day Camp
$2,200


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
Wheeler-Dowe Club Summer Program
$14,000


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
Stonybrook Boys & Girls Club Summer Program
$4,500


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
Finish Line Club Summer Program
$12,500


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
Lilly Club Summer Program
$14,000


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
LeGore Club Summer Program
$14,500


Boys & Girls Clubs of Indianapolis
Keenan-Stahl Summer Program
$15,000


Brebeuf Jesuit Preparatory School
Prep at Brebeuf
$3,000


Brightwood Community Center Inc.
SPARKS Summer Camp
$12,300


Broadway United Methodist Church
JSP Roving Youth Corps
$17,000


Brooke’s Place for Grieving Young People
Camp Healing Tree
$8,000


Burmese American Community Institute
Upward College Summer Program 2016
$12,500


Butler University Jordan College of the Arts
Butler Community Arts School Summer Programs
$13,500


Calvary Temple Assembly of God
The Olympians Road Trip
$5,500


Camptown, Inc.
Summer Wilderness Adventure
$29,000


Catholic Charities Indianapolis, Inc.
Holy Family Shelter Summer Camp
$10,750


Catholic Charities Indianapolis, Inc.
Neighborhood Youth Outreach
$9,000


Catholic Youth Organization Camp Rancho Framasa
Inclusive Residential Summer Camp
$7,000


Center for Interfaith Cooperation
Center for Interfaith Cooperation Summer Youth Camp
$4,000


Center for Leadership Development
Imani Book Club
$3,000


Children’s Bureau, Inc.
Rachel Glick Courage Center Summer Enrichment Program
$10,000


Children’s Museum of Indianapolis, Inc.
StarPoint Program
$15,500


Christamore House, Inc.
2016 Christamore House Summer Camp
$24,363


Christel House Academy, Inc.
CHASE (Christel House Academy Summer Enrichment)
$5,000


Circle City Frontiers Club, Inc
A Winning Experience
$7,500


Claude McNeal’s Musical Training Program
Performing Arts Camp
$7,000


Coburn Place Safe Haven II
Enhanced Summer Break Services
$8,000


Community Alliance Of The Far Eastside, Inc. (CAFE)
CAFE Teen Leadership and Career Development Camp
$39,863


Community Health Network Foundation
Community Healing Hearts- Youth Bereavement Services: Camp Erin
$6,000


Concord Center Association, Inc.
DIY Summer Day Camp 2016
$40,863


Cosmo Knights Scholarship Fund, Inc.
Cosmo Knights Junior Instructional Golf Program
$7,000


Damar Services, Inc.
Damar Summer School and Camp
$12,100


Dance Kaleidoscope
DK Summer Residency
$3,500


Dayspring Center
Camp Discovery 2016
$8,500


Diabetic Youth Foundation of Indiana
2016 Camp Until A Cure
$13,000


DirectEmployers Association Foundation
STEM YES! (Science, Technology, Engineering & Mathematics Youth Enhancement Summer) Program
$8,000


Dyslexia Institute of Indiana
Camp Delafield
$9,000


Early Learning Indiana
Summer Health and Water Safety Program
$6,000


Earth Charter Indiana
A Youth Power Summer 2016
$5,000


East Tenth United Methodist Children and Youth Center, Inc.
Summer Days for Youth 2016
$23,000


Edna Martin Christian Center
Leadership and Legacy Summer Program 2016
$29,363


Englewood Christian Church
DayStar Summer School Ager Program
$4,000


Englishton Park Presbyterian Ministries, Inc.
Englishton Park Academic Remediation and Training Center
$24,000


Entrepreneurial Ventures in Education, Inc.
Inspiring Scholars 2016
$75,000


Fay Biccard Glick Neighborhood Center At Crooked Creek
FBGNC Letting Off STEAM Summer Camp
$30,363


Felege Hiywot Center, Inc.
Youth-Led Farm STEM Camp
$28,000


Fight For Life Foundation, Inc.
Seal the Deal Camp
$4,000


First Samuel Missionary Baptist Church, Inc.
FIRST SAMUEL SUMMER ENRICHMENT CAMP
$7,000


Flanner House of Indianapolis, Inc.
Flanner House 5 Focus Summer Camp
$42,363


Fletcher Place Community Center, Inc.
Art in The City
$6,250


Footlite Musicals, Inc.
Summer Youth Programs
$2,000


Forest Manor Multi-Service Center
Summer Camp
$36,863


Freetown Village, Inc.
“It Takes a Village” Summer Camp
$27,000


Freewheelin Community Bikes
Summer Earn-A-Bike Program
$5,000


Girl Scouts of Central Indiana, Inc.
Girl Scout Day Camp
$7,500


Girls Incorporated of Greater Indianapolis
Girls Inc. Strong, Smart, and Bold Summer Camp
$12,000


Girls Rock! Indianapolis
Girls Rock! Indianapolis Year Round & Rock Camp
$5,000


Guidance Life-Skills And Mentoring (G.L.A.M.), Inc.
G.L.A.M Summer Experience
$8,000


Good News Mission, Inc.
Good News Ministries Summer Youth Program
$5,000


Great Commission Church of God
2016 Young Men, Inc. Summer Empowerment Camp
$13,000


Greater Gethsemane Missionary Baptist Church
GGMBC Summer Youth Academy
$1,200


Groundwork Indy, Inc.
Green Team Program
$15,000


Happy Hollow Children’s Camp, Inc.
2016 Summer Camp
$39,000


Harrison Center for the Arts
Summer Academe
$11,500


Hawthorne Social Service Association, Inc.
Hawthorne Summer Day Camp 2016
$47,863


Health and Science Innovations
2016 Young Innovators Quest
$15,500


Hear Indiana, a chapter of the Alexander Graham Bell Association for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Hear Indiana Listening & Spoken Language Camp for Deaf and Hard of Hearing Children
$7,500


Hemophilia of Indiana, Inc.
Camp Brave Eagle
$5,000


Hispanic/Latino Minority Health Coalition Greater of Indianapolis
Your Life. Your Story. Latino Youth Summit
$10,000


Honor Without End, Inc.
HWE Youth Empowerment Program – Annual KAA Camping Trip
$5,000


Horizons at St. Richard’s Episcopal School
Horizons at SRES Summer Program
$49,000


Iibada Dancers, Inc.
The Art of Movement: From Studio to Stage
$7,500


Immanuel Presbyterian Church
Dreamcatching Fortitude In Young Adults
$3,000


IN Deaf Camp Foundation, Inc.
IN Deaf Camp Kids Camp
$6,000


Indiana Annual Conference of the United Methodist Church
The Hope Project
$3,200


Indiana Golf Foundation, Inc.
Gongaware Junior Golf Academy
$6,000


Indiana Latino Institute
ILI Summer Internship Program
$9,000


Indiana Performing Arts Centre, Inc.
Summer Musical Theatre Camp
$7,500


Indiana School for the Deaf
Willard Summer Program
$6,000


Indiana State Museum Foundation, Inc.
Indiana State Museum Summer Camps
$10,000


Indiana University
Literacy with iPads for K-3 Youth
$35,000


Indiana University
Herron School of Art and Design Youth Art Camp 2016
$10,000


Indiana University
Girls STEM Institute (GSI) – formally known as the STEM in You Summer Enrichment Program
$4,500


Indiana University
Camp Yes And: A summer improv camp for teens on the autism spectrum and teachers
$2,500


Indiana Writers Center
Building a Rainbow
$9,000


Indianapolis Algebra Project, Inc.
Indianapolis Algebra Project Summer Math Program
$64,000


Indianapolis Art Center
ArtReach
$15,000


Indianapolis Ballet, Inc.
Ballet Summer Camps 2016
$4,000


Indianapolis Children’s Choir
Summer Music Education Programming
$6,500


Indianapolis Interfaith Hospitality Network, Inc.
Summer Fun at IHN
$4,000


Indianapolis Museum of Art, Inc.
IMA Summer Camps 2016
$2,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Camp Gather
$12,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Summer Food Service Mobile Units
$9,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Indy Youth Achievers
$9,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Everyone Swims
$9,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Indy Urban Acres Summer Program
$5,000


Indianapolis Parks Foundation
Lifeguard Training Program
$10,000


Indianapolis Soap Box Derby Association, Inc.
Inner City Youth Racing League Program
$7,000


Indianapolis-Marion County Public Library Foundation
Summer Reading Program 2016
$58,500


Jackson Center for Conductive Education
Jackson Center Summer Camp
$3,500


James Whitcomb Riley Memorial Association
Camp Riley
$8,500


Jameson, Inc.
Jameson Camp Residential Summer Camp
$23,000


Julian Center, Inc.
2016 Therapeutic Summer Camp at The Julian Center
$8,500


Just The Beginning- A Pipeline Organization
Summer Legal Institute
$8,500


Keep Indianapolis Beautiful, Inc.
2016 Youth Tree Team
$6,500


Kids Dance Outreach, Inc.
Kids Dance Outreach Summer Session
$4,500


La Plaza, Inc.
Summer Discovery
$24,000


La Plaza, Inc.
Leadership Institute for Latino Youth
$17,363


Latino/a Youth Collective of Indiana, Inc.
Campecine Youth Academy
$12,000


Lawrence United Methodist Church
Lawrence Youth Corp
$5,000


Life Line Community Center
Youth Grow and Glow
$1,000


Like a Lion, Inc.
Like a Lion’s Summer Camp
$500


Lillian Davis Foundation
2016 Building to Acquire New Knowledge Summer Enrichment Camp
$8,500


Little Red Door Cancer Agency
Camp Little Red Door
$10,000


Lutheran Child & Family Services of Indiana
Lutherwood Summer Program
$8,500


Madame Walker Urban Life Center
Kamp Kuumba Summer 2016
$15,000


Marian University
Summer Learning Institute
$44,000


Marian University
Marian University STEM Summer Camps
$15,500


Marion County Commission on Youth
Youth Working for Indy 2016
$103,500


Martin Luther King Multi-Service Center Indianapolis Incorporated
Read to Lead Summer Enrichment Program
$19,000


Mary Rigg Neighborhood Center
Summer Day Camp: Be an Olympian – Strive for Greatness
$48,863


Metropolitan School District of Pike Township
Extended Learning Program (Camp Discovery)
$7,500


Miracle Place
Academic Olympics
$5,000


Mission Indy Inc.
Summer Program
$3,500


Montessori Educational Charity
M2STEM 2016
$6,500


Mount Moriah Missionary Baptist Church
Camp Jeremiah
$8,000


MSD of Lawrence Township Foundation Inc.
Sunnyside Side by Side Enrichment Summer Camp
$3,000


Muscular Dystrophy Association
MDA Summer Camp 2016
$7,500


Music for All, Inc.
Music for All Summer Symposium
$9,000


National Association of Black Accountants
ACAP (Accounting Careers Awareness Program)
$3,500


National Junior Tennis League of Indianapolis, Inc.
Summer Youth Tennis Program
$12,250


New Beginnings
New Beginnings Zoom Zoom
$7,000


New Covenant Church & Ministries, Inc
Multimedia In Focus 2016 Summer Media Camp
$5,500


Nine13sports
Kids Riding Bikes Summer Programs
$6,500


Noble, Inc.
Noble Summer Day Camps
$7,500


Northside New Era Community Outreach Corporation
SON Shiners Character Summer Camp
$6,000


Oasis
M.U.S.T.A.R.D Seed Group
$9,500


Outdoor Youth Exploration Academy
Outdoor Youth Exploration Academy Summer Program
$7,500


Paramount School of Excellence
STEAM – Success Through Education, Agriculture and Mentoring
$15,000


Partnerships for Lawrence, Inc.
Summer Art Camp
$10,000


Pathway Resource Center, Inc.
Training Youth for Success (TYFS)
$9,000


Peace Learning Center
Peacebuilders Camp
$20,000


Philharmonic Orchestra of Indianapolis
Strings & Jazzy Things music camp
$15,000


Project Endure, Inc.
Project Endure Trek 5
$4,000


Promise Land Christian Community Church
Promise Land Youth Enrichment Camp
$7,000


Purdue University
Purdue Extension-Marion County’s Summer Camp Enhancement Program
$7,500


Saint Florian Center, Inc.
SFC Leadership Development Summer Camp
$30,000


Saint Florian Center, Inc.
SFC Firefighters Youth Employment
$9,000


School on Wheels Corp
It’s a WRAP! (Writing, Reading, Art & Performance)
$8,000


Senior Connects Corporation
21st Century Skills Internship
$22,000


Shepherd Community, Inc.
YLiFe
$10,500


Shepherd Community, Inc.
Summer EXCEL
$15,000


Social Health Association of Indiana
Step Up for Kindness!™ & CARE
$20,000


Southeast Community Services
FACES of Southeast Youth: Financial Coaching, Academic Support, Career Coaching, Entrepreneurship and Service
$10,500


Sow One Foundation, Inc.
Summer Arts Programs
$3,000


Speedway Baptist Church
Speedway Baptist Summer Heroes
$6,500


Starfish, Inc.
Starfish Initiative Freshman Orientation Summer Program
$7,500


STEM Connection
The STEM Connection @ Moore Road Farm Science and Nature Camp
$1,500


Stop the Violence Indianapolis, Inc.
The “TALKS – Identifying The Mirror In Me”
$5,500


Storytelling Arts of Indiana
Summer Storytelling Performances
$4,000


Symphonic Youth Orchestra of Greater Indianapolis, Inc.
Symphonic Youth Orchestra of Greater Indianapolis
$5,500


TRUST CORP/Indianapolis Housing Agency
PRIDE Summer Program 2016
$29,000


Teachers’ Treasures
Summer Program Supplies Resource
$10,000


TeenWorks (formerly Pro 100)
TeenWorks Summer Employment and College Readiness Program
$35,000


The American Fund for Preventive Medicine
Forever-Fit Summer Camp
$8,650


The John H. Boner Community Center
Excellence, Discovery and Growth through Education (EDGE)
$12,500


The John H. Boner Community Center
Preparing, Achieving and Caring for Tomorrow (PACT)
$16,363


The Oaks Academy
Camp Oaks
$6,000


The People’s Burn Foundation
Camp Saturday Brave Hearts
$7,000


The Salvation Army Ruth Lilly Women and Children’s Center
Summer of Wonder Day Camp
$8,000


The Salvation Army
Salvation Army Fountain Square Day Camp Program
$5,000


The Salvation Army
The Salvation Army Eagle Creek Summer Adventures
$2,500


The Salvation Army
Hidden Falls Camp
$5,000


The Sanctuary Outreach, Inc.
The Sanctuary Outreach: Reach Out Summer Enhancement Camp
$4,000


Trinity House Academy, Inc.
Summer Academy 2016
$5,500


Wayne Township Education Foundation
Science Summer Safari
$5,000


Westminster Neighborhood Services, Inc.
K-8 Summer Program
$14,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Baxter YMCA Summer Camp
$3,000


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Early Learners Summer Kinder Academy
$7,000


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Turning Points/From Day 1 Summer Institute
$7,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Flat Rock River YMCA Summer Resident Camp
$8,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Jordan YMCA Summer Camp at Eagle Creek Park
$3,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Jordan YMCA Summer Day Camp
$3,000


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
YMCA Day Camp at Arlington Elementary
$4,000


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Laurelwood YMCA Summer Camp Program
$8,800


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Ransburg YMCA Summer Day Camp
$5,000


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Pike YMCA Summer Day Camp
$4,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
YMCA Day Camp at Wayne Township/ Bridgeport Elementary
$4,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
Benjamin Harrison YMCA Summer Day Camp
$4,500


YMCA of Greater Indianapolis
YMCA Day Camp at The YMCA at CityWay
$3,000


Young Actors Theatre
Young Actors Theatre Summer Camps
$6,000


Young Audiences Indiana
Inspiring Scholars
$20,000


Young Audiences Indiana
ArtForce
$7,000


Young Life
Summer Camp
$3,000


Zion Hill M. B. Church, Inc.
Zion Hill Summer Enrichment Program
$10,500




TOTAL:


$2,602,193 




 
 

Related Posts



 

Personal Mobility




 

Woman finds dream job through Exodus Refugee




 

Legacy Fund honors community “pillars”








Comments

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (required)




Mail (required)


(will not be published)










Current ye@r *




Leave this field empty




 
 
 
 
 

































 

 




Summer Youth Program Fund Indianapolis 2017 - Summer Youth Employment Program | Scholarship Web











Scholarship WebHome
Scholarships

Scholarships for Developing Country


Guides

Financial Guides


Contact us
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
 Summer Youth Employment Program AddressKaiser Permanente Summer Youth ProgramKaiser Permanente Summer YouthKaiser Permanente Summer Youth EmploymentKaiser Permanente Summer Youth Program 2018Kaiser Permanente Summer Youth Program 2018Kaiser Permanente Summer Youth InternshipSummer Youth Employment Program At Kaiser PermanenteKaiser Permanente Youth Summer Program 2018Summer Youth Employment Program SyepSummer Youth Employment Program Syep KaiserSummer Youth Employment Program WestchesterSummer Youth Programs In Memphis TnHospital Summer Youth Volunteer ProgramSummer High School Journalism Institute 2018City Of Atlanta Summer Foods ProgramSummer Youth Employment Program 2018Summer Youth Employment Program 2018 PaSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 NycSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 FloridaSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 OhioSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 NySummer Youth Employment Program 2018 ChicagoSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 NjSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 CtSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 DenverSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 ArizonaSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 ColoradoSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 MarylandSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 MichiganSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 HoustonSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 CaSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 AzSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 DcSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 LoginSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 DetroitSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 DelawareSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 GeorgiaSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 DallasSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 SeattleSummer Youth Employment Program 2018 TucsonSummer Youth Programs In CtSummer Youth Programs In The BronxSummer Youth Programs In CaliforniaSummer Youth Programs In ChicagoSummer Youth Programs In ClevelandSummer Youth Programs In Columbus OhioSummer Youth Programs In Cincinnati OhioSummer Youth Programs In Cleveland OhioSummer Youth Programs In Twin CitiesSummer Youth Programs In Clarksville TnSummer Youth Programs In Corpus ChristiSummer Youth Programs In Corpus ChristiSummer Youth Employment Program




Stimulus expected to fund summer youth work program

As much as $900,000 expected from the federal stimulus package will fund summer youth programs for eligible residents of a 19-county area served by Workforce Solutions in West Central Texas, members of the Brownwood Area Chamber of Commerce were told Friday.
				Tagged with: workforce solutions summer youth program.
			

Updated: Evanston secures grant to fund summer youth employment program

Cook County awarded Evanston a grant earlier this month for more than $100,000 to fund the Mayor’s Summer Youth Employment ... Cinemark and Buffalo Wild Wings are among the 17 private employers participating in the program, Brown said.
				Tagged with: cicf summer youth program fund, summer youth program fund, buffalo mayors summer youth application, ncaa funds summer youth program.
			

National Youth Sports Program Fund

Categorized under Athletic Organizations. Our records show it was established in 1994 and incorporated in Indiana. Current estimates show this company has an annual revenue of 150000 and employs a staff of approximately 3.
				Tagged with: national youth sports program indianapolis.
			

Tech gets $30,000 donation to fund summer youth program for women

Cody Kangas, director of Tech’s Center for Pre-College Outreach, said in the release the WIAE summer youth program will connect talented female ... “Although women purchase 60 percent of all vehicles and influence nearly 85 percent of all car-buying ...
				Tagged with: purchase college summer youth programs.
			

Indianapolis gets federal funds for youth jobs program

INDIANAPOLIS (AP) — Indianapolis is set to receive $2 million in federal money that will help pay for a summer jobs program for disadvantaged youth. The Indianapolis Star reports that the city is among 11 communities that will get a cut of a $21 million ...
				Tagged with: summer youth programs indianapolis.
			

Summer Youth employment Program

Helps patients in the ICU. She went to UCLA for her undergrad and Med school. Trained and worked at Kaiser for 11 years. One of her problems was getting into med school because she had gotten knee surgery which made it hard for her to move and focus.
				Tagged with: kaiser summer youth employment program syep, summer youth employment program kaiser.
			

Summer Youth Employment Program

The Department of Employment Services (DOES) is currently accepting applications for the Summer Youth Employment Program. You may have missed our program helping teens to apply, but it's not too late to get your application in. DOES continues accepting ...
				Tagged with: dc summer youth employment parental consent form, dc summer youth employment application, dc summer youth employment program 2018, dc summer youth employment program application.
			

Richmond Summer Youth Program

My name is Adel Hazan and along with my co-worker Brian Day; we are trying to raise funds to help support the underserved youth that we work with in Richmond ... Program: Our focus is specifically with high school aged youth and we saw the need for a ...
				Tagged with: summer programs richmond ca, summer school richmond ca, at risk youth programs contra costa county.
			

Summer Program For Youth

Summer Program For Youth is located at the address Po Box 612 in Carlisle, Pennsylvania 17013. They can be contacted via phone at (717) 243-4220 for pricing, hours and directions. Summer Program For Youth has an annual sales volume of 501K - 999,999. .For ...
				Tagged with: summer program for youth carlisle pa 17013.
			

Indianapolis gets federal funds for youth jobs program

Indianapolis is set to receive $2 million in federal money that will help pay for a summer jobs program for disadvantaged youth. The city is among 11 communities that will get a cut of a $21 million federal grant that will also pay for violence-reduction ...
				Tagged with: summer youth program indianapolis, summer youth programs indianapolis, summer youth employment program indianapolis.
			

Summer Youth Program Fund feeds thinking and making at Herron Creativity Camps

“Scholarships are good,” she said, “because there are a lot of kids who want to come to camp but can’t. That’s too bad because they may not be able to become what they want to be. I feel lucky.” Thanks to donors including the Summer Youth ...
				Tagged with: lilly endowment scholarship application 2018 marion county, cicf summer youth program fund, iupui summer camps for youth.
			

Summer Youth Volunteer Program

for its Youth Volunteer Program. Youth can spend their summer break as a summer camp volunteer, play with children, help to build and maintain exhibits, explore art and education with families, help in the office, assist with special events, public and ...
				Tagged with: summer youth volunteer programs calgary, youth summer volunteer programs georgia, summer youth volunteer programs seattle.
			

Atlanta Summer Youth Program

The city of Atlanta has millions of stimulus money available to put 16 to18 year old teenagers to work as part of the Atlanta Workforce Development Agency’s Summer Youth Program ... bring a Food Stamp Award letter, or (TANF) Temporary Assistance ...
				Tagged with: city of atlanta summer youth program, youth summer programs in atlanta ga, atlanta workforce development summer youth program, atlanta workforce development agency summer youth program, summer youth programs in atlanta ga.
			

AmeriCorps Youth Summer Program

AmeriCorps members present the 2011 Youth Summer Program for children in grades four-eight. The three week program will be exciting and diverse and offer a positive learning experience. The program includes a service learning component on the first day of ...
				Tagged with: .
			

Summer Youth Employment Program

... Area Youth Service Bureau in conjunction with the City of Torrington is operating the 2016 Summer Youth Employment program funded through the CT Department of Labor's Regional Workforce Investment Board. Summer jobs are available for youth between 14 ...
				Tagged with: summer youth employment program 2016, summer youth programs in ct.
			

Atlanta Summer Youth Program

The city of Atlanta has millions of stimulus money available to put 16 to18 year old teenagers to work as part of the Atlanta Workforce Development Agency’s Summer Youth Program ... bring a Food Stamp Award letter, or (TANF) Temporary Assistance ...
				Tagged with: city of atlanta summer food program.
			

Youth summer journalism program

PETERSBURG — The renowned Poynter Institute is looking for a select group of Bay area students to participate in its high school summer journalism program ... who will enter high school in the fall of 2015. Thirty-five total students are selected ...
				Tagged with: summer high school journalism institute 2015.
			

Youth Volunteer Summer Program

Our Youth Volunteer Summer Program provides opportunities for students aged 14 to 17 in which they may give their time in a hospital or clinical setting. These volunteer jobs include snack cart, book cart, valet assistant, and information desk guide among ...
				Tagged with: hospital summer youth volunteer program.
			

Summer Youth Program

memphis is one of 16 cities ... named a "summer impact hub" by the obama administration ... dr. cheri hoffman/white house ambassador: " we consider this a youth violence prevention program. and starting young people out with jobs, not only keeping them ...
				Tagged with: summer youth program in memphis.
			

Summer Youth Employment Program

And the program connected her with jobs at Kaiser Permanente and the Richmond City Attorney ... Years after entering the program, Anderson, 24, spoke at the kick-off breakfast for the Summer Youth Employment Program, sponsored by the community coalition ...
				Tagged with: summer youth employment program address, kaiser permanente summer youth, summer youth employment program at kaiser permanente, kaiser permanente summer youth program 2017, kaiser permanente summer youth program.
			



  Recent Posts


Money Lessons: A Guide to Financial-Literacy Resources


Scholarships for Nigerian International Students – Open Now


Scholarships4Moms.net Reviews – Legit or Scam?


Transfer Student Scholarships & Grants


Scholarships for Transfer Students for the 2017 Academic Year



Categories

Financial Guides

Guides

Scholarships



Sponsored Links





Return to top of pageCopyright © 2017 ·  Genesis Framework · WordPress · Log in












News - Central Indiana Community Foundation






















































































 

















 




























Menu








							Twitter
						



							Facebook
						






Home > News 










													Personal Mobility												





This month, For Good looks at personal mobility. We’ll explore how limited access to transportation can impact opportunities for employment, healthcare and social services. But most importantly, we’ll look at what’s being done in Central Indiana to revolutionize the way we get from place to place.






													Woman finds dream job through Exodus Refugee												





Priscilla Lalthanmawii and her 12-year-old son arrived in the United States on Feb. 24, 2015. The day was long-awaited. They fled Burma in 2008 and were living in a Malaysian refugee camp for five years before being granted a resettlement appointment with the United Nations. That meeting led to their 800-mile trip to join the nearly 15,000 other Burmese people Exodus Refugee has helped resettle in Indianapolis.






													Legacy Fund honors community “pillars”												





The Legacy Fund Community Pillar Awards honor individuals or corporations doing visionary work to solve pressing challenges, build opportunity and equity, and create a brighter future for Hamilton County residents in three leadership areas—college readiness and success, family success and inspiring places. Because of their work, these nominees are pillars of the Hamilton County Community. Accepting nominations thru July 31.






													The Indianapolis Foundation Now Accepting Phase II Community Crime Prevention Grant Applications												





The Indianapolis Foundation, a Central Indiana Community Foundation affiliate, has announced that it is accepting applications for phase II of the Community Crime Prevention Grants Program starting July 1 through July 31. The grant program is funded from public resources allocated annually by Indianapolis City-County Council and has been administered by the Indianapolis Foundation since 2013.






													Meet Kamala Spencer												





Kamala Spencer joined the CICF family seven months ago as the development director for Women’s Fund. In this month’s staff blog, Kamala talks about her jump from corporate sales to not-for-profit fundraising, and offers advice for those wanting to become more philanthropic. It’s not hard to see Kamala’s passion for community and why she’s inspired by her work. 






													Ten Sheridan High School Seniors Receive Scholarships												





The Sheridan Community School Scholarship Foundation Fund recently awarded 10 Sheridan High School seniors scholarships totaling $28,000 for the 2017-2018 school year. Just two years prior, the committee researched ways to ensure the scholarship fund would continue its original mission for generations to come—to provide scholarships to graduates from Sheridan High School.






													Central Indiana Community Foundation Affiliates Awards $1.1 Million in Scholarships												





CICF and its affiliates, The Indianapolis Foundation and Legacy Fund, serving Hamilton County, awarded 159 scholarships totaling nearly $1.1 million for the 2017-2018 academic year. 






													Women’s Fund of Central Indiana convenes nine cities, 46 college campuses and more to announce mental health partnership												





Women’s fund brings Campaign to Change Direction to Indiana to normalize the conversation around mental health.






													A Park’s Purpose												





In 2012, a master plan was adopted to completely renovate and redesign Tarkington Park, a feat estimated to cost $12 million in total, and phase 1, the most recently competed phase, costing $6 million. Included in Phase 1 is the play area built into the landscape, a spray plaza, comfort stations, basketball courts and, eventually, a performance stage and a local vendor to operate the café. 






													Marion County Organizations Receive $1.4 Million From The Indianapolis Foundation												





Marion County not-for-profit organizations (23) will receive grants totaling $1,429,000 from The Indianapolis Foundation, a Central Indiana Community Foundation affiliate. Grants were approved on May 9 by the foundation’s board of directors.






													Legacy Fund, Youth Advisory Board Award $124,500 to Hamilton County Organizations												





Legacy Fund approved the allocation of $124,500 to 16 not-for-profit organizations serving Hamilton County at its May 9 board meeting. Three of the grants approved by Legacy Fund’s board totaling $15,000 were recommended by LINK Youth Advisory Council (LINK). 






													The Indianapolis Foundation Announces Recipients of $400,000 Community Crime Prevention Grants												





The Indianapolis Foundation, an affiliate of Central Indiana Community Foundation, announced the 10 Marion County not-for-profit organizations receiving a grant in phase I of the Community Crime Prevention Grant Program. The foundation manages the grant program on behalf of the Indianapolis City-County Council, who voted in March to approve a new, expedited grant round focused on organizations preventing or reducing crime.






													Community partners team to launch Marion County Promise in Indianapolis												





CICF is working with local partners to launch Marion County Promise at select Indianapolis schools and not-for-profit organizations, to put more students on the path to post-secondary education. 




 

 
 































 

 









Grants & assistance for business | business.gov.au













































skip to content
skip to navigation











Grants & assistance

Search our free grants & assistance tool to find support, funding, assistance packages and loans for your business from all levels of government.
Or, you can also see all results.










Search















Was this helpful?

Not at all
Slightly
Moderately
Very
Extremely



Thanks for your feedback. If you have any ideas on how we can improve, we'd love to hear them.
Please provide your comments in the feedback form.










                Feedback
            




                News
            




                Subscribe
            






                Share
            















Tweet









                Print
            




                Email
            





                You might also be interested in
            





Grants & assistance        


                Innovation Connections
            

                Provides small and medium sized businesses with access to expert technology advice to address technology and knowledge gaps, and collaborate with the research sector in developing new ideas with commercial potential. Support includes up to $50,000 in matched funding to work on collaborative projects.
            








Grants & assistance        


                Accelerating Commercialisation
            

                Provides businesses with access to expert advice and matched funding of up to $1 million to cover eligible commercialisation costs to help them to take novel products, processes and services to market.
            








Grants & assistance        


                Incubator Support
            

                Provides new and existing business incubators with matched funding of up to $500,000, to assist Australian start-ups develop the capabilities required to succeed in international markets.

            







                    Show more
                



















Industry Skills Fund Youth Stream | business.gov.au













































skip to content
skip to navigation











Industry Skills Fund Youth Stream







Tell me about the assistance





I'm ready to apply





Helps business by supporting job specific training for new and young employees. Helps community organisations to help young people return to school, start vocational training or move into work. 


Status:  Closed


Delivered by: AusIndustry



Overview
The Industry Skills Fund - Youth Stream includes two pilot programmes: Training for Employment Scholarships and Youth Employment Pathways.
Applications for both pilot programmes are now closed.
As part of the 2016/17 Budget announcement, both the Training for Employment Scholarships and the Youth Employment Pathways pilot programmes have ceased. No new applications will be taken.
All eligible claims for payment related to approved applications and executed contracts will be paid.
For more information, you can contact us by web chat, email, or call us on 13 28 46.
What support or funding is available?
The programmes assist business by supporting job specific training for new, young employees; and community organisations to help young people return to school, start vocational training or move into work.

Training for Employment Scholarships supports training that meets the needs of your business and assists young people who are newly employed, but require further training.
   If your business has less than 200 employees, and you have hired an unemployed person aged 18 to 24 years within the last three months, you may be eligible for funding of up to $7,500 for the cost of up to 26 weeks job specific training.
Youth Employment Pathways supports community organisations to assist disengaged young people, aged 15 to 18 years, to get back into school, start vocational training, or move into work.
    Community service organisations may be eligible for up to $2,000 in financial support to purchase or provide services to meet individuals' needs such as intensive case management, job search, mentoring and other services relevant to young people.

Key documents
The customer information guides provide information about the Training for Employment Scholarships and the Youth Employment Pathways programmes. These documents can be found below.
The programme guidelines provide the authority for the Training for Employment Scholarships and the Youth Employment Pathways programmes. These documents can be found below.
Version Two of the Programme Guidelines came into effect as of 1 September 2015. Any Funding Agreements executed after this date will be governed by these Guidelines.
Training for Employment Scholarships Programme

Customer Information Guide Version 2
Customer Information Guide Version 2
Programme Guidelines Version 2 (signed) 
Programme Guidelines Version 2

Youth Employment Pathways Programme

Customer Information Guide Version 2
Customer Information Guide Version 2
Programme Guidelines Version 2 (signed)
Programme Guidelines Version 2






Applications for both Youth Employment Pathways and Training for Employment Scholarships are now closed.
For more information:

start a web chat
email us
call us on 13 28 46.









Was this helpful?

Not at all
Slightly
Moderately
Very
Extremely



Thanks for your feedback. If you have any ideas on how we can improve, we'd love to hear them.
Please provide your comments in the feedback form.










                Feedback
            




                News
            




                Subscribe
            






                Share
            















Tweet









                Print
            




                Email
            





                You might also be interested in
            





Run        


                Training
            

                Investing in skills and training can increase productivity and innovation, help you attract and retain high quality employees and improve customer satisfaction.
            








Grants & assistance        


                Automotive Industry Structural Adjustment Programme
            

                The Automotive Industry Structural Adjustment Programme supports workers who have lost their job in the automotive manufacturing industry, including component suppliers.
            








Grants & assistance        


                Inspiring Australia – Science Engagement Programme
            

                The Inspiring Australia - Science Engagement Programme supports a range of science communication and engagement activities to inspire, motivate and cultivate a scientifically engaged community across Australia.
            







                    Show more
                















Scholarship Program | The Azarian Group, LLC
















































 












FacebookRssLinkedinEmail
   (201) 444-7111 |   info@azariangroup.com



 











LEARN ABOUT OUR NEWEST ACQUISITION, THE LIVINGSTON TOWN CENTER








Company InfoAboutServicesAcquisitionsDevelopmentProperty ManagementLeasingInsuringConstructionMeet The TeamBrochurePropertiesNews & PressScholarship ProgramHow To ApplyIn Loving MemoryContact UsCompany InfoAboutServicesAcquisitionsDevelopmentProperty ManagementLeasingInsuringConstructionMeet The TeamBrochurePropertiesNews & PressScholarship ProgramHow To ApplyIn Loving MemoryContact Us




 









Scholarship Program

Home/Scholarship Program








			Scholarship Program		


AzarianGroup 


			2015-09-21T21:25:21+00:00		

Scholarship Program
The John M. Azarian Memorial Armenian Youth Scholarship Fund was formed in 1976 following the untimely death of John M. Azarian, Sr., beloved husband and father. Mr. Azarian was the son of Armenian immigrants and worked hard his entire life to serve the Armenian church and its community. He worked unselfishly for St. Leon’s Armenian Church and was instrumental in relocating the church from Paterson to Fair Lawn, New Jersey. He was a founding father of the church in its new location and served for many years as an elected member of the Parish Council, specifically acting as Treasurer, on Fund Raising projects, and capital programs.
Mr. Azarian started from humble beginnings, growing up in Paterson, New Jersey. He put himself through college, attending Seton Hall University in West Orange, New Jersey, and graduated with a degree in Accounting. He passed the CPA exam and became a practicing accountant, initially with Peat, Marwick and Mitchell and he later started his own practice with an office in downtown Paterson, New Jersey, which he later moved to Hawthorne, New Jersey. Besides being devoted to the Armenian church, Mr. Azarian also worked hard to help others and volunteered a considerable amount of his time to various charities.
Since its formation, the John M. Azarian Memorial Armenian Youth Scholarship Fund has awarded over $500,000 in grants to assist financially deserving Armenian students who might otherwise not be able to complete their undergraduate studies. It is our hope that someday those who we have helped will be able to give something back to those who are less fortunate.
Sadly, Martin G. Azarian passed away suddenly on April 18, 2009. Marty was a beloved husband to Geraldine, son to Barbara Azarian McCullough, nephew to Ed Azarian and Joyce Avedisian and brother to John, brother in law to Donna and Uncle to Alyssa, Amanda, John III, and James.




Scholarship ProgramHow To Apply
In Loving Memory


 
 

 
 
 
 






















	
	Home




















































































 










































HomeCurrently selectedAbout Us
What is NYDA?Executive DirectorsNYDA Strategy
Performance ReportsAnnual ReportsStrategy DocumentsNYDA Budget
Youth Employment Accord
Media Centre
Press ReleasesAudio & Video ClipsSpeechesMedia CoverageOpinion Pieces
Beneficiary StoriesBranches & Local Youth OfficesSupply Chain Management
Active TendersArchive TendersOutcome of TendersIDC TendersPayments to Suppliers
2nd South African Youth Awards










NYDA Web























 Latest News 








         Beneficiary of the week: Mnguni Brothers, Vusi and Sboniso from Umzinto in KwaZulu-Natal                        Vusi (32) and Sboniso Mnguni (34) from Umzinto in KwaZulu-Natal were wrongfully imprisoned and sentenced to 106 years each for armed robbery and impersonating police officers in 2005. They were convicted at the age of 14 and 16 respectively and spent 14 years each at Westville prison. They were discovered by Ms. Fanele Mdlalose when she was conducting a Life Skills Training at the prison.
The Mnguni brothers grew up within a business-oriented household which specialised in the buying and selling of goods. Unfortunately, the business had to close down after their father’s passing, which resulted in the establishm...                       read more            NYDA engages the young people in Mamelodi, Pretoria.                       On Friday the 30th of June 2017, the Deputy Minister in The Presidency; responsible for Monitoring and Evaluation, Mr. Buti Manamela, Deputy Minister of Communications, Ms. Thandi Mahambehlala and NYDA Executive Deputy Chairperson, Ms. Bavelile Hlongwa hosted a youth dialogue in Mamelodi, Pretoria. The dialogue was held under the theme “embracing our collective history enhances our prospects of social cohesion.” Underpinning the youth dialogue was the role Solomon Mahlangu played in the liberation struggle and his everlasting legacy for the democracy we continue to enjoy in South Africa. 
The Executive Deputy Ch...                       read more            Beneficiary of the Week: Temo Ke Bophelo Primary Agricultural Co-op                        ​Temo Ke Bophelo, which means ‘Agriculture is Life’, is an agricultural cooperative operating at Umjindini rural area in Mbombela, Mpumalanga. The cooperative is using a piece of land that the Chief of Umjindini has given them.
The business supplies vegetables such as tomatoes, spinach, green peppers, onions, lettuce and cabbages to local supermarkets as well as exports their produce to Mozambique and Swaziland. Started by five (5) young people, the business  currently employs three (3) people permanently and has an annual turnover of R178 400.
The cooperative also supplies their products to both Cambridge and ...                       read more            Address by President Jacob Zuma at the National Youth Day Commemorationn at Tshing Sports Ground in Ventersdorp, North West.                       ​
Theme: “The Year of Oliver Reginald Tambo: Advancing Youth Economic Empowerment”
 
The Premier of the North West
Ministers, Deputy Ministers, MECs, Executive Mayors and councillors,
Members of Parliament and Legislature,
Members of the Provincial House of Traditional Leaders also here present,
Leadership of the National Youth Development Agency and other youth organisations,
All the young people of South Africa,
Fellow South Africans,
 
Bagaetso Dumelang! Molweni! Sanibonani!
 
Today South Africa marks 41 years since the heroic uprising by the youth of our country on 16 June 1976.
 
This year’s n...                       read more            Media statement by NYDA Executive Chairperson, Mr. Sifiso Mtsweni at the Media Briefing.                        
I would like to take this opportunity to acknowledge the presence of the Honourable Ms Regina Lesoma (MP), who is a member of the Portfolio Committee for Public Services & Administration. We appreciate your presence. I would like to also acknowledge my fellow Board Members and the Executive of the NYDA. A special welcome and acknowledgement to the members of the media who are present today. You are an important stakeholder who keeps us accountable to the youth and helps us get the word out to the young people. We acknowledge the crucial role that you play.  
 
Today Africa celebrates the 54th anniversary...                       read more            NYDA Congratulates the 2nd South African Youth Awards Winners                       The National Youth Development Agency (NYDA) wishes to congratulate all the young people who won the 2nd South African Youth Awards as announced at the Awards Ceremony which was held at Saint Georges Hotel & Conference Centre in Pretoria.
 
Deputy Minister in the Presidency Honourable Buti Manamela has this to say "The South African Youth Awards recognises and celebrates the achievement of South Africa’s most precious resource, its young people".
 
While delivering the keynote address at the Awards Ceremony, Minister in the Presidency Honourable Jeff Radebe, “South African Youth Awards offer us ...                       read more            Beneficiary of the Week Musa Dikobe                        ​Musa Dikobe established Citrus Green Solutions in 2009, a cleaning company operating in the Nelson Mandela Bay. The business offers eco-friendly services with expertise in the food and manufacturing industry such as high rise cleaning, manufacturing plant and warehouse cleaning, pressure cleaning and office cleaning.
The business currently employs 32 people who service the company’s clients. The company has also secured contracts with SAB, UTI, and Scribante Concrete.
Citrus Green Solutions is one of the few companies in the Nelson Mandela Bay that offers eco-friendly services in the automotive and food indust...                       read more             

















 Products and Services 



Full-service Branches
Career Guidance
JOBS Database & Matching Service
Co-operatives support
Youth Volunteering
Business Opportunities Support Services
Mentor Registration Form











 Key Programmes 



NYDA | IDC | sefa Youth Fund
NYDA Second Chance Programme
Solomon Mahlangu Scholarship Fund
NYDA Grant Programme
Youth Build Programme
National Youth Service Programme
Entrepreneurship Development Programme
Volunteer Business Mentorship Programme
Business Consultancy Service (Voucher) Programme












 
 

 
 





 











Self Service Portal 
Login
Register





Map To NYDA Head Office​
 
NYDA Branchesl
 
 NYDA Complaints 
Enquire Online 
Fraud and Corruption Prevention Hotline 
0800 203 240 
Click here to report








Social

















Tweets by @NYDARSA























 Gallery 



NSC Second Chance Matric Results Release 2016
2016 Annual Report Briefing
NYDA & MASHUP MOU
Deputy Minister's Orange Farm Youth Expo
Youth Day 2016



















 ​Careers at NYDA 
NYDA Job Adverts
 
Download NYDA application form for employment ​
 







 Careers Gateway 



 
Career Guidance: Questionnaire - occupations - programmes - bursaries - coursechooser. 
 







 Opportunities 



 
       2017 Graduate Development Programme
 
    Ship for World Youth Program​ 
 
WARNING; Beware of bogus/illegal colleges
 
 
  My Hands and Heart
 
  




















            Poll
        









Where do you find information on job opportunities?







Newspaper

Internet

Word of mouth




































 . 



​                      Recent publications

NYDA Annual Report 2015 - 2016 



























Contact Us
Enquire Online
Map to NYDA Head Office
Careers @ NYDA


News & Events
Recent Publications
Research & Policy


Facebook
Twitter
YouTube


PAIA Manual
Disclaimer




Copyright © 2015 National Youth Development Agency.  All Rights Reserved.











































